Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-136
Vehicle, defined.

Vehicle means a motor vehicle, all-terrain vehicle, utility-type vehicle, minibike,
trailer, or semitrailer.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 36;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 8.